Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 2. TRIAL, JUDGMENT, AND APPEAL

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 8. STATE EXEMPTION FROM CERTAIN FEES: FEES PAID BY OPPOSING PARTY

Sec. 8.01. STATE EXEMPTION. The state is exempt from the payment of the filing fee imposed by Section 51.701, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.01(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 8.02. FEE PAID BY OPPOSING PARTY. If the state prevails in a lawsuit, the opposing party shall pay the entire amount of any filing fee attributable to the state, including any amount exempted under Section 8.01.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 4.01(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.